Hawaii statutes.
[§304A-2679] Pledge of revenue of the
university. The resolution authorizing the issuance of revenue bonds may
pledge to the payment thereof all or any part of the revenue of the university,
and the pledge shall constitute a lien on revenue of the university to the
extent and in the manner provided in the resolution prior and paramount to any
claim or other obligation of any nature against the revenue of the university
so pledged subsequently arising or incurred. The board may provide in the
resolution that all revenue bonds of the same issue be equally and ratably
secured without priority by reason of number, date, or maturity of the bonds,
date of sale, execution, or delivery thereof. Any pledge of revenue of the
university contained in any resolution adopted under this subpart shall be
valid from and after the adoption of the resolution without physical delivery
of the revenue of the university pledged or the necessity of any further action
by the State or the board, or any officer or agent of the State or the board.
[L 2007, c 161, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next